ro-RO: Designul cârligului pentru fața de masă: Tensiune reglabilă; Stil clemă; Scai; Magnetic; Cu prindere rapidă; Cu arc; Altele
zh-TW: 桌布夾設計: 張力可調; 夾式; 魔鬼氈; 磁性; 夾式; 彈簧式; 其他
th: การออกแบบคลิปหนีบผ้าปูโต๊ะ: ปรับความตึงได้; ดีไซน์แบบหนีบ; ตะขอและห่วง; แม่เหล็ก; สลิปออน; แบบหัวสปริง; อื่นๆ
ko: 테이블보 클립 디자인: 조절식 장력; 클램프형; 후크 앤 루프; 자기식; 슬립온; 스프링 탑재; 기타
pt-PT: Design de fixador de toalha de mesa: Tensão ajustável; Estilo grampo; Gancho; Magnético; Deslizante; Com mola; Outro
pt-BR: Design do prendedor de toalha de mesa: Tensão ajustável; Estilo com grampo; Fecho gancho e laço; Magnética; Slip-on; Com mola; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на щипка за покривка за маса: Регулируемо обтягане; Тип „скоба“; Кука и примка; Магнитно; С ластик; С пружина; Друго
de: Design der Klemme für Tischdecken: Einstellbare Spannung; Klemmart; Klettband; Magnetisch; Slipper; Gefedert; Sonstiges
nb: Design av dukklemmer: Regulerbar spenning; Klemmestil; Krok og løkke; Magnetisk; Slip-on; Fjærbelastet; Annet
nl: Ontwerp van tafelkleedklem: Instelbare spanning; Klemmodel; Klittenband; Magnetisch; Opschuifsluiting; Veerbelast; Overig
sv: Design av bordsduksklämma: Justerbar spänning; Klämliknande; Krok & slinga; Magnetisk; Slip-on; Fjäderladdad; Annat
zh-CN: 桌布夹设计: 可调张力; 夹式; 钩环; 磁吸式; 套入式; 弹簧式; 其他
pl: Konstrukcja klipsa do obrusu: Regulowany naciąg; Klips zaciskowy; Rzep; Magnetyczne; Nasuwane; Sprężynowe; Inne
ja: テーブルクロスクリップのデザイン: テンション調整可能; クランプ式; フック＆ループ; マグネット式; スリップオン; スプリング式; その他
cs: Design svorky na ubrus: Nastavitelné; Se svorkami; Suchý zip; Magnetické; Nasazovací; Pružinové; Jiné
it: Design della clip per tovaglia: Tensione regolabile; Stile morsetto; Gancio e anello; Magnetico; Slip on; Caricato a molla; Altro
es: Diseño de pinza para mantel: Tensión regulable; Estilo abrazadera; Velcro; Magnético; Sin cordones; Con resorte; Otros
vi: Thiết kế kẹp khăn trải bàn: Có thể điều chỉnh độ căng; Kiểu kẹp; Khóa dán; Từ tính; Kiểu cắm vào; Chịu tải bằng lò xo; Khác
lt-LT: Staltiesės segtuko tipas: Reguliuojamas įtempimas; Spaustuko tipo; Tvirtinama kabliuku; Magnetinis; Užmaunamas; Spyruoklinis; Kita
hu: Asztalterítő klip kialakítás: Állítható feszesség; Csíptethető; Tépőzár; Mágneses; Rácsúsztatható; Rugós; Egyéb
da: Dugklemmedesign: Justerbar spænding; Klemmestil; Burrebånd; Magnetisk; Slip-on; Fjederbaseret; Andet
hr-HR: Dizajn kopče za stolnjak: Podesiva napetost; Kopčasti stil; Čičak-traka; Magnet; Bez vezivanja; S oprugom; Ostalo
sk-SK: Dizajn spony na obrus: Nastaviteľné napnutie; Svorkový; Suchý zips; Magnetický; Nasúvací; Napnutý pružinou; Iné
fr: Type de fixation pour nappe: Tension réglable; Style pince; La boucle du crochet; Magnétique; À enfiler; À ressort; Autre
en: Tablecloth clip design: Adjustable tension; Clamp-style; Hook & loop; Magnetic; Slip-on; Spring-loaded; Other
fi: Pöytäliinan pidikkeen muotoilu: Säädettävä kireys; Puristintyyppinen; Tarranauha; Magneettinen; Painamalla kiinnitettävä; Jousellinen; Muu
sl-SI: Oblika sponke za prt: Nastavljiva napetost; Sponka; Kavelj in zanka; Magnetno; Natikanje; Vzmetna; Druga
el: Σχεδιασμός κλιπ τραπεζομάντιλου: Ρυθμιζόμενη τάση; Στυλ σφιγκτήρα; Αυτοκόλλητο βέλκρο; Μαγνητικό; Ολίσθησης; Με ελατήριο; Άλλο
tr: Masa örtüsü klipsi tasarımı: Ayarlanabilir gerginlik; Kelepçeli; Cırt cırtlı; Mıknatıslı; Geçirmeli; Yaylı; Diğer
ru: Конструкция зажима для скатерти: С регулировкой натяжения; Зажимного типа; Липучка; Магнитный; Накидной; Пружинный; Другой